Tennessee, session 114, HB0081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3001(c)(1), is amended by
adding "within three (3) days of the transfer date" after "to which the student transfers".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0081
000520
- 1 -